Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.250

Review of water system plan—Time limitations—Notice of rejection of plan or extension of timeline.

For any new or revised water system plan submitted for review under this chapter, the department shall review and either approve, conditionally approve, reject, or request amendments within ninety days of the receipt of the submission of the plan. The department may extend this ninety-day time limitation for new submittals by up to an additional ninety days if insufficient time exists to adequately review the general comprehensive plan. For rejections of plans or extensions of the timeline, the department shall provide in writing, to the person or entity submitting the plan, the reason for such action. In addition, the person or entity submitting the plan and the department may mutually agree to an extension of the deadlines contained in this section.

[ 2002 c 161 s 1.]